Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Guardianship and Conservatorship for Disabled Persons
387.620.
Petition for relief — Hearing on petition — Judgment or modification.

A partially disabled or disabled person, his limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator, or any other interested person may petition the court for:

Termination or modification of an order of partial disability or disability;

Removal and/or replacement of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator or conservator; or

Renewal of the appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator.

Petitions pursuant to this section shall set forth:

The name and address of the ward;

The name and address of the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator;

The name, address, and interest of the petitioner;

The names and addresses of the ward’s next of kin, if known;

The name and address of the individual or facility, if any, having custody of the ward;

The relief requested; and

The facts and reasons supporting the request.

A request under subsection (1) of this section, if made by the ward, may be communicated to the court by any means, including, but not limited to, oral communication or informal letter. If such a request is communicated by means other than a petition, the court shall appoint a suitable person who may, but need not be, an employee of the state, county, or court to prepare a written petition to be filed with the court within seven (7) days following the appointment.

Within thirty (30) days after the filing of a petition, the court shall conduct a hearing at which the ward shall be entitled to counsel. The time for a hearing may be extended by the court, on motion of either party, for cause. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given by the clerk of the court not less than fourteen (14) days prior to the hearing to both parties and all persons named in the petition. The petitioner shall, upon his motion, be entitled to have the motion for termination or modification determined by a jury.

At the request of any party or on its own initiative, the court may order an interdisciplinary evaluation of the ward. The time period in which the court must review a petition may be extended for an appropriate period of time if an evaluation is ordered by the court. The interdisciplinary evaluation report may be filed as a single or joint report of the interdisciplinary evaluation team, or it may otherwise be constituted by the separate reports filed by each individual of the team. If the court and all parties to the proceeding and their attorneys agree to the admissibility of the report or reports, the report or reports shall be admitted into evidence and shall be considered by the court.

Upon conclusion of a modification hearing without a jury, the court shall enter a written order setting forth the factual basis for its finding and may do any of the following:

Dismiss the petition;

Remove the guardian or conservator and dissolve the guardianship or conservatorship order;

Remove the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator and appoint a successor;

Modify the original guardianship or conservatorship order; or

Make any other order which the court deems appropriate and in the best interest of the ward.

If the original order is dissolved and no further order is issued, the ward shall be relieved of all legal disabilities. The court shall enter an order and judgment restoring to the person all of the rights and privileges of a citizen. The clerk shall note the judgment or modification in the book in which notices of actions and encumbrances are indexed.

The clerk of the court shall transmit a certified copy of the restoration judgment or modification to the originating court, if the judgment or modification is ordered by a court other than the court in which the original judgment was entered.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 13, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 395, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 425, § 7, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Petition for Relief, Modification or Termination (AOC 795), Form 260.20.

387.630.
Committee to assume duties of guardian — Powers — Nullification of adjudication of incompetency.

Any person appointed committee for an incompetent person prior to July 1, 1982, shall assume the duties of a guardian and shall be subject to all of the provisions of KRS

387.500

to

387.770

pertaining to guardians, including all reporting requirements. The committee shall, within one (1) year from July 1, 1982, petition for modification of the original order if a less restrictive guardianship or conservatorship would be more appropriate.

In all instances where an adjudication of incompetency was entered prior to July 1, 1982, and no committee has been appointed or is serving on that date, the adjudication of incompetency shall be considered null and void if no guardian or conservator is appointed within one (1) year of July 1, 1982.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 14, effective July 1, 1982.

387.640.
Duties of limited guardian or guardian.

It shall be the general duty of the limited guardian or guardian to carry out diligently and in good faith the specific duties and powers assigned by the court and to:

Assure that the personal, civil, and human rights of the ward are protected; and

Encourage the ward to:

Participate to the maximum extent of his abilities in all decisions which affect him;

Act in his own behalf on all matters in which he is able to do so; and

Develop or regain, to the maximum extent possible, his capacity to meet the essential requirements for his physical health or safety, and, if impaired, his capacity to manage his financial resources.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 15, effective July 1, 1982.

387.650.
Assignment of powers and duties to limited guardian by court — Reporting requirements.

The court may assign to a limited guardian any portion of the powers and duties specified in KRS

387.660

. The court may assign other duties as are necessary to enhance the ward’s safety and well being. A limited guardian shall comply with the reporting requirements specified by KRS

387.670

which pertain to his powers and duties as specified by the court, provided that all reports submitted shall include the information required by paragraphs (d) and (f) of KRS

387.670

(1).

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 16, effective July 1, 1982.

387.660.
Specific powers and duties of guardian.

A guardian of a disabled person shall have the following powers and duties, except as modified by order of the court:

To establish the ward’s place of abode within the state, except that, if at any time a guardian places a ward in a licensed residential facility for developmentally disabled persons, the guardian shall, within thirty (30) days of such placement, file with the court notice of the placement, stating with specificity the reasons for such placement, and an interdisciplinary evaluation report detailing the social, psychological, medical or other considerations on which such placement is predicated, a description of the treatment or habilitation programs which will benefit the ward as a result of such placement, and a determination that such placement will provide appropriate treatment in the least restrictive available treatment and residential program. For purposes of this subsection, the interdisciplinary evaluation report may be one performed within two (2) months prior to the placement for purposes of determining whether such placement is necessary and appropriate, or may be an evaluation and assessment provided by the residential facility immediately after placement. Notice to the court shall not be required where the ward is transferred from one licensed residential facility to another;

To make provision for the ward’s care, comfort, and maintenance and arrange for such educational, social, vocational, and rehabilitation services as are appropriate and as will assist the ward in the development of maximum self-reliance and independence;

To give any necessary consent or approval to enable the ward to receive medical or other professional care, counsel, treatment or service, except that a guardian may not consent on behalf of a ward to an abortion, sterilization, psychosurgery, removal of a bodily organ, or amputation of a limb unless the procedure is first approved by order of the court or is necessary, in an emergency situation, to preserve the life or prevent serious impairment of the physical health of the ward;

To act with respect to the ward in a manner which limits the deprivation of civil rights and restricts his personal freedom only to the extent necessary to provide needed care and services to him; and

To expend sums from the financial resources of the ward reasonable and necessary to carry out the powers and duties assigned to him by the court.

If a separate limited conservator or conservator has been appointed for the ward, the expenditure of funds by the limited guardian shall be consistent with the duties assigned to and procedures and policies established by such limited conservator or conservator. Conflicts arising between a limited guardian and a limited conservator or conservator regarding the expenditure of funds which are unable to be otherwise resolved shall be submitted to the court for resolution.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 17, effective July 1, 1982; 2018 ch. 13, § 8, effective July 14, 2018.

387.670.
Annual report of guardian.

A guardian shall file with the court at least annually a verified report stating:

The ward’s current mental, physical, and social condition;

The address of every residence of the ward during the reporting period and length of stay at each residence;

A summary of the medical, social, educational, vocational, and other professional services received by the ward during the reporting period;

An outline of the guardian’s visits with and activities on behalf of the ward;

A recommendation as to the need for continued guardianship;

A statement signed by the standby guardian, if one has been appointed, that the standby guardian continues to be willing to serve in the event of the death, resignation, removal, or incapacity of the guardian; and

Other information requested by the court or useful in the opinion of the guardian.

For the purpose of filing the report required by subsection (1) of this section, the guardian shall be given access to records pertaining to the ward held by public or private agencies which contain information necessary for the guardian to perform his duties.

The court shall review the report required in subsection (1) of this section and take whatever action it considers necessary to enhance the well-being of the ward.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 18, effective July 1, 1982; 2018 ch. 13, § 9, effective July 14, 2018.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Treece, Powers of Attorney, Volume 54, No. 1, Winter 1990 Ky. Bench & B. 26.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Annual Report of Guardian (AOC 790), Form 260.19.

387.680.
Duties of limited conservator or conservator.

It shall be the general duty of the limited conservator or conservator to carry out, diligently and in good faith, the specific duties and powers assigned by the court and to:

Manage or assist in managing those financial resources placed under his supervision and/or control as would a prudent person managing his own resources, including establishing or placing resources in a trust, and, if a conservator has special skills or is named conservator on the basis of representations of special skills or expertise, he shall use those skills; and

Encourage the ward to:

Participate, to the maximum extent of his abilities, in all decisions which affect him;

Act on his own behalf on all matters in which he is able to do so; and

Develop or regain, to the maximum extent possible, his capacity to manage his financial resources and, if impaired, his capacity to meet the essential requirements for his physical health or safety.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 19, effective July 1, 1982; 2018 ch. 13, § 10, effective July 14, 2018.

387.690.
Specific duties of limited conservator or conservator.

A limited conservator or conservator shall expend or distribute, or authorize the expenditure or distribution of, or assist in the expenditure or distribution of, the principal or income from the financial resources placed under his supervision and control to assure that:

The essential requirements for the physical health or safety of the ward are met;

The rights of the ward are protected;

The financial resources of the ward which are subject to the conservatorship are prudently managed;

The ward has the opportunity to develop or regain the capacity to perform the functions listed in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (2) of KRS

387.680

; and

The limited guardian or guardian for the ward, if any, is able to carry out the duties and powers assigned to him by the court.

In performing his duties, the limited conservator or conservator shall consider:

The size of the financial resources under the limited conservator’s or conservator’s supervision or control;

The probable duration of the conservatorship;

The likelihood that the ward may be able to manage his financial resources in the future;

The accustomed standard of living of the ward;

Other funds or resources used for the support of the ward which have not been placed under the control or supervision of the limited conservator or conservator; and

The requests of the ward and the ward’s limited guardian or guardian, if any.

In addition to the duties and powers listed in subsection (1) of this section, the court may assign to a limited conservator any of the duties and powers listed in KRS

387.700

which the partially disabled person lacks the ability to perform.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 20, effective July 1, 1982.

387.700.
Specific powers and duties of conservator.

A conservator has all of the powers conferred herein and any additional powers conferred by law on trustees in this state. The conservator may take possession of the ward’s real and personal property, and of all rents, incomes, and benefits therefrom, whether accruing before or after his appointment, and of the proceeds arising from the sale, mortgage, lease or exchange thereof. Subject to such possession the title of all such estate and to the increment and proceeds thereof shall be to the ward and not to the conservator. It is the duty of the conservator to protect and preserve the estate, to retain, sell and invest it as hereinafter provided, prosecute or defend actions, claims or proceedings in any jurisdiction for the protection of the estate’s assets, to account for it faithfully, to perform all other duties required of him by law, and, at the termination of the conservatorship, to deliver the assets of the ward to the persons lawfully entitled thereto.

The conservator shall apply the money and property for the payments of debts, taxes, claims, charges and expenses of the conservatorship and for the support, care, maintenance and education of the ward or his dependents.

Any sale of realty of a ward shall be as provided in KRS Chapter 389A.

Any lease of mineral rights, oil and gas rights, or sale of timber owned by a ward, or consolidation agreement, as defined by KRS

353.220

, to be made on behalf of a ward by a conservator shall require the authorization and order of the District Court of the county where the conservator has qualified. Such order may be given only pursuant to written motion which contains the grounds for the motion and a description of the lease or agreement involved.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 21, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 277, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 169, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2018 ch. 13, § 11, effective July 14, 2018.

387.710.
Filing of inventory by limited conservator or conservator — Biennial report — Final report and account.

Within sixty (60) days of appointment, the limited conservator or conservator shall file with the court a verified inventory of all the property of the ward which has come to his possession or knowledge, including a statement of all encumbrances, liens, and other secured claims on any item, any claims against the estate of the ward, and any cause of action accruing to the ward. The limited conservator or conservator shall provide a copy thereof to the ward if he has sufficient mental capacity to understand it.

A limited conservator or conservator shall file with the court a verified report and financial account biennially within one hundred twenty (120) days after the anniversary date of his appointment. The report shall contain:

The present personal status of the ward whose estate is managed by the conservator;

The conservator’s plan for preserving and maintaining the estate of which he has control or supervision;

The need for continuation or cessation of the conservatorship; and

The need for any alteration in the powers of the conservatorship.

The biennial report shall specify the amount and type of real and personal property received by the conservator and remaining in his control or invested by him, the nature of such investment, and expenditures made during the preceding year. Upon request of the court, the conservator shall produce for examination any information or documentation which the court may consider relevant to the accounting of the financial and property transactions of the estate.

If the ward has no real property and possesses personal property of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less for any year during the biennial report, the conservator or limited conservator may file an informal biennial financial report attesting to the identity of the ward’s financial account and its current balance. If the balance does not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for any year of the biennial report, the conservator or limited conservator shall not be required to render to the court a detailed accounting of the expenditures from the fund, unless the court, on its own motion or that of any interested party or individual, deems it necessary to order the conservator or limited conservator to provide a detailed biennial accounting, including the listing of all expenditures for that reporting period.

Upon the resignation, removal, or death of a limited conservator or conservator, or on the termination of the conservatorship, the limited conservator or conservator, or his personal representative, shall forthwith submit a final report and account to the court and to the former ward and to the successor limited conservator or conservator, or, if the ward is deceased, to his personal representative, and shall pay over the trust estate to the person entitled thereto. Upon approval of the report and account, the limited conservator or conservator shall be discharged and his surety, if any, released.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 22, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 425, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 2001, ch. 19, § 1, effective March 15, 2001; 2018 ch. 13, § 12, effective July 14, 2018.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Final Report, Form 260.22.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., 60 Day Inventory or Supplemental Inventory (AOC 855), Form 260.18.

387.720.
Surety of limited conservator or conservator.

The court may require a limited conservator or conservator to provide surety on his bond consistent with the provisions of KRS

395.130

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 23, effective July 1, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Application for Appointment of Fiduciary for Disabled Persons (AOC 745), Form 260.04

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Fiduciary Bond (AOC 825), Form 260.17.

387.730.
Testamentary nomination — Succession of parent as guardian.

A parent, spouse, or child of a partially disabled or disabled person who has been appointed as limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator of that person may, by will, nominate an individual to succeed in that capacity upon the testator’s death. Such nomination shall be reviewed by the court pursuant to KRS

387.620

upon admitting the will to probate if no other person is serving in that capacity at the time of the testator’s death and no standby guardian or conservator has been appointed.

When the biological or adoptive parents of a disabled person are appointed coguardians of that person and one (1) of the coguardians dies, the survivor shall become the successor guardian without any additional action by the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 24, effective July 1, 1982; 1990, ch. 487, § 22, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Application for Appointment of Fiduciary for Disabled Persons (AOC 745), Form 260.04.

387.740.
Emergency powers of court — Petition and hearing on emergency appointment.

The court may exercise the powers of a limited guardian or limited conservator or may appoint an individual or agency to exercise such powers before or during the pendency of a proceeding for a determination of partial disability or disability or an appeal therefrom, if it appears that there is danger of serious impairment to the health or safety of the respondent or damage or dissipation to his property if immediate action is not taken.

Prior to a hearing on the need for an emergency appointment of a limited guardian or limited conservator, a petition shall be filed by any person or entity which sets forth the following:

The name, age, and address of the respondent;

The danger alleged to be imminent;

The type of appointment and the protection and assistance requested;

The facts and reasons supporting the request;

The name, address, and qualifications of the proposed limited guardian or limited conservator, if any;

The name, address, and interest of the petitioner;

The names and addresses of the respondent’s next of kin, if known;

The name and address of the individual or facility, if any, having custody of the respondent; and

The date of filing of the petition for determination of disability or partial disability.

The court shall review any and all petitions for an emergency appointment of a limited guardian or limited conservator without delay and not more than one (1) week after the petition is filed. The circuit clerk in the county in which the petition is filed shall accept all petitions and the Commonwealth shall not exclude any petition filed under this section from presentation to the court. Within one (1) week of the filing of a petition pursuant to this section, the court shall conduct a hearing at which the respondent shall be entitled to counsel.

Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given not less than forty-eight (48) hours prior to the hearing to all persons named in the petition, the petitioner, and the Commonwealth unless waived in writing or on the record.

The Commonwealth shall present evidence at the hearing. The petitioner shall have the right to present evidence in support of the petition at the hearing in addition to any evidence presented by the Commonwealth, and shall have the right to cross-examine witnesses.

The burden shall be on the Commonwealth and the petitioner to prove by clear and convincing evidence the need for the emergency appointment of a limited guardian or conservator.

If the court exercises the powers of a limited guardian or limited conservator or appoints another to do so in an emergency situation as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the court shall state on the record findings of fact as to the danger determined to be imminent, the sources relied on in arriving at such determination, the type of assistance to be provided, and the powers and duties of the emergency guardian or conservator. The authority of the guardian or conservator shall expire upon resolution of the appeal or action.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 25, effective July 1, 1982; 2022 ch. 182, § 3, effective April 8, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/8/2022).
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 182, sec. 5, provides that this statute, as amended in that Act, may be cited as the Jeff Tyler Act.

387.750.
Standby appointee — Powers and duties.

On appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator, or at any time thereafter, the court may designate another suitable person or entity to assume the powers and duties assigned to the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator upon his death, resignation, removal, or incapacity. Prior to such designation, the individual or entity to be designated shall file with the court a written application stating the name, address, and qualifications of the applicant and his relationship, if any, to the respondent.

The individual so designated shall file an acceptance with the court within ten (10) days of the death, resignation, or incapacity of his predecessor. Notice shall also be given to the ward and his nearest adult relative. An individual serving on a standby basis may exercise all the powers and duties assigned to his predecessor upon filing of his acceptance unless otherwise ordered by the court.

In an emergency situation and in the absence and unavailability of the initially appointed guardian or conservator, the standby guardian or conservator may temporarily assume the powers and duties of the initially appointed guardian or conservator.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 26, effective July 1, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Application for Appointment of Fiduciary for Disabled Persons (AOC 745), Form 260.04.

387.760.
Court costs — Compensation, commission, and reimbursement for expenses.

No court costs shall be charged to a respondent or ward in any proceeding under KRS

387.500

to

387.770

, if the respondent or ward is a poor person as defined in KRS

453.190

.

Limited guardians, guardians, limited conservators and conservators are entitled to reasonable compensation for services rendered and to reimbursement for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the exercise of their assigned guardianship or conservatorship duties and powers. Such compensation and reimbursement shall be paid from the financial resources of the ward and shall not exceed:

A commission of not more than six percent (6%) of the income collected by the fiduciary, payable at the time the income is collected; and

Either, but not both, of the following, as elected by the fiduciary:

An annual commission of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) of the fair market value of the real and personal property in the care of the fiduciary; or

An annual commission of not more than six percent (6%) of the fair market value of the principal distributed by the fiduciary, payable at the time the principal is distributed.

In the absence of an agreement to the contrary, a commission on income shall be paid out of the income of the estate and a commission on principal shall be paid out of the principal of the estate.

Upon submitted proof showing that in the handling of the estate the fiduciary has performed additional and necessary services which have been unusual or extraordinary and not normally incident to the care and management of a similar estate, the court may allow the fiduciary additional compensation as is fair and reasonable for the additional services rendered.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 27, effective July 1, 1982; 2008, ch. 130, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 28, § 20, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Guardians and Conservators (Mentally Disabled Persons), § 260.00.

387.770.
Confidentiality of records — Expungement of records — Disclosure of information, log.

All determinations of disability and orders of appointment, modification, and termination shall be filed as public records with the clerk of the court. All other court records of a respondent made in all proceedings under KRS

387.500

to

387.770

shall be confidential and shall not be open to the general public except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

Following the dismissal or withdrawal of a petition filed under this chapter or a determination that a respondent is no longer disabled, the respondent may at any time move to have all court records pertaining to the proceedings expunged from the files of the court, provided that he submits a full release of all claims arising from the proceedings.

Any person seeking to obtain confidential information contained in the court files or the court records of proceedings under KRS

387.500

to

387.770

may file a written motion stating why the information is needed. The court may issue an order to disclose such information upon a showing that the disclosure is appropriate under the circumstances and in the best interest of the person or the public. The court shall maintain a log of the individuals and entities granted access to the file or records.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 28, effective July 1, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Wiederstein, Closed Courtrooms and the Public’s Right of Access, Vol. 67, No. 4, July 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 15.

387.780.
Qualifications of persons suing as next friend — Liability for costs. [Repealed.]

387.790.
Court order permitting use of ward’s income.

Notwithstanding anything in KRS

387.010

to

387.280

to the contrary, when a guardian or conservator is in reasonable doubt as to the right to use the income or principal from the ward’s estate for the benefit of the ward, the guardian or conservator may apply to the District Court for permission to do so by filing a verified petition stating the reasons for the application. The court may grant the order ex parte, and the order shall be prima facie protection to the guardian or conservator in the settlement of the guardianship or conservatorship accounts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 25, effective July 13, 1990.

387.800.
Notices.

Any first notice relating to failure to file reports of any type required in this chapter and any notices of rule motions shall be sent by the court or by the party making the motion to the attorney of record for the guardian.

If there is no attorney of record or a second or subsequent notice relating to failure to file reports, or any second or subsequent notice with regard to a rule motion, the notice shall be sent by the court or by the party making the motion to the guardian as well as to the attorney of record, if any, and the guardian.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 26, effective July 13, 1990.